South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 33-31-202(c) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (c) The articles of incorporation may set forth: (1) the purpose for which the corporation is organized which may be, either alone or in combination with other purposes, the transaction of any lawful activity; (2) the names, addresses, and zip codes of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors; (3) provisions not inconsistent with law regarding: (i) managing and regulating the affairs of the corporation; (ii) defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors, and members, or any class of members; and (iii) the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations attaching to each or any class of members; (4) any provision that under this chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws.; (5) the age, education, ethnicity, gender, race, salary, sex, disability status, service in a branch of the United States Armed Forces, first language, and number of years in leadership of the executive director, chief operating officer, president, and founder. SECTION 2.  Section 33-31-1005 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 33-31-1005.  (A) A corporation amending its articles shall deliver to the Secretary of State articles of amendment setting forth: (1) the name of the corporation; (2) the text of each amendment adopted; (3) the date of each amendment's adoption; (4) if approval of members was not required, a statement to that effect and a statement that the amendment was approved by a sufficient vote of the board of directors or incorporators; (5) if approval by members was required: (i) the designation, number of memberships outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each class indisputably voting on the amendment; and (ii) either the total number of votes cast for and against the amendment by each class entitled to vote separately on the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by each class and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each class was sufficient for approval by that class; (6) if approval of the amendment by some person or persons other than the members, the board, or the incorporators is required pursuant to Section 33-31-1030, a statement that the approval was obtained; (7) if an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of memberships, provisions for implementing the amendment if not contained in the amendment itself must be included in the articles. (B) In addition to the provisions in subsection (A), a corporation's articles of amendment may also include the age, education, ethnicity, gender, race, salary, sex, disability status, service in a branch of the United States Armed Forces, first language, and number of years in leadership of the executive director, chief operating officer, president, and founder. SECTION 3.  Section 33-56-30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (C) The statements may contain the age, education, ethnicity, gender, race, salary, sex, disability status, service in a branch of the United States Armed Forces, first language, and number of years in leadership of the executive director, chief operating officer, president, and founder. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----